Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.060

Registration fees.

The director shall charge and collect the fees specified by this section. All fees are nonrefundable and shall be deposited in the state treasury.

(1) The registration fee is two hundred dollars.

(2) The renewal fee is one hundred twenty-five dollars.

(3) The amendment fee is thirty dollars.

[ 1981 c 155 s 6.]